Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.275

Council created—Membership—Duties—Advisory committees.

(1) In collaboration with staff whom the office of financial management may assign, and within funds made expressly available to the state board for these purposes, the state board shall assist the governor by convening and providing assistance to the council. The council shall include one representative from each of the following groups: Each of the commissions, the state board, the department, the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the health care authority, the department of agriculture, the department of ecology, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the department of children, youth, and families, the workforce training and education coordinating board, and two members of the public who will represent the interests of health care consumers. The council is a class one group under RCW 43.03.220. The two public members shall be paid per diem and travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The council shall reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and gender. The governor or the governor's designee shall chair the council.

(2) The council shall promote and facilitate communication, coordination, and collaboration among relevant state agencies and communities of color, and the private sector and public sector, to address health disparities. The council shall conduct public hearings, inquiries, studies, or other forms of information gathering to understand how the actions of state government ameliorate or contribute to health disparities. All state agencies must cooperate with the council's efforts.

(3) The council with assistance from the state board, shall assess through public hearings, review of existing data, and other means, and recommend initiatives for improving the availability of culturally appropriate health literature and interpretive services within public and private health-related agencies.

(4) In order to assist with its work, the council shall establish advisory committees to assist in plan development for specific issues and shall include members of other state agencies and local communities.

(5) The advisory committee shall reflect diversity in race, ethnicity, and gender.

[ 2018 c 58 s 19; 2006 c 239 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 58: See note following RCW 28A.655.080.